North Dakota, session 69, HB1596.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 19-03.1-22.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. A person who is under twenty-oneeighteen years of age and intentionally ingests,
inhales, injects, or otherwise takes into the body a controlled substance that is
marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol, unless the substance was medical marijuana
obtained in accordance with chapter 19-24.1, is guilty of a class B misdemeanoran
infraction.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subdivision d of subsection 7 of section 19-03.1-23 of the
North Dakota Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
d. A person who violates this subsection by possessing:
(1) Marijuana:
(a) In an amount of less than one-half ounce [14.175 grams] is guilty of
an infractionsubject to a noncriminal citation if the person is eighteen
years of age or older.
Page No. 1 25.1054.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
(b) In an amount of less than one - half ounce [14.175 grams] is guilty o f
an infraction if the person is under eighteen years of age.
(c) At least one-half ounce [14.175 grams] but not more than 500one
hundred grams of marijuana is guilty of a class B misdemeanoran
infraction.
(c)(d) At least one hundred grams but not more that five hundred grams of
marijuana is guilty of a class B misdemeanor .
(e) More than 500five hundred grams of marijuana is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
(2) Tetrahydrocannabinol:
(a) In an amount less than two grams is guilty of an infractionsubject to a
noncriminal citation if the person is eighteen years of age or older.
(b) In an amount less than two grams is guilty of an infraction if the
person is under eighteen years of age.
(c) At least two grams but not more than sixfour grams of
tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class B misdemeanoran infraction.
(c)(d) At least four grams but not more than six grams of
tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class B misdemeanor .
(e) More than six grams of tetrahydrocannabinol is guilty of a class A
misdemeanor.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Subsection 9 of section 19-03.1-23 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
9. If a person pleads guilty or is found guilty of a first offense regarding possession of
one ounce [28.35 grams] or less than five hundred grams of marijuana or twofour
grams or less of tetrahydrocannabinol and a judgment of guilt is entered, a court, upon
motion, shall seal the court record of that conviction if the person is not subsequently
convicted within two years of a further violation of this chapter. Once sealed, the court
record may not be opened even by order of the court.
SECTION 4. A new section to chapter 19-03.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Page No. 2 25.1054.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
Noncriminal marijuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or paraphernalia violation.
1. An individual cited under this chapter or under subsection 4 of section 19 - 03.4 - 03 with
a noncriminal marijuana, tetrahydrocannabinol, or paraphernalia violation is subject to
a noncriminal citation carrying a fee of one hundred fifty dollars. The individual may :
a. Appear before the designated official and pay the statutory fee for the violation
charged at or before the time scheduled for a hearing; or
b. Forfeit bond by not appearing at the designated time, if the individual already
posted the bond.
2. If the individual is cited for a marijuana violation under state law and posts bond by
mail, the bond must be submitted within fourteen days of the date of the citation and
the individual cited shall indicate on the citation whether a hearing is requested. If the
individual:
a. Does not request a hearing within fourteen days of the date of the citation, the
bond is deemed forfeited and the violation admitted.
b. Requests a hearing, the court for the county in which the citation is issued shall
issue a summons to the individual requesting the hearing notifying the individual
of the date of the hearing before the designated official in accordance with this
section.
3. Upon appearing at the hearing scheduled in the citation or otherwise scheduled at the
individual's request, the individual may make a statement in explanation of the
individual's action. The official may at that time waive, reduce, or suspend the statutory
fee or bond, or both. If the individual cited follows the foregoing procedures, the
individual is deemed to have admitted the violation and to have waived the right to a
hearing on the issue of commission of the violation.
4. The bond required to secure appearance must be identical to the statutory fee for a
violation of this chapter or subsection 4 of section 19 - 03.4 - 03 .
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 19-03.4-03 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. A person may not use or possess with the intent to use drug paraphernalia to ingest,
inhale, or otherwise introduce into the human body marijuana or tetrahydrocannabinol
or possess with the intent to use drug paraphernalia to store or contain marijuana or
Page No. 3 25.1054.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
tetrahydrocannabinol in violation of chapter 19-03.1. A person under eighteen years of
age violating this subsection is guilty of an infraction. A person eighteen years of age
or older violating this subsection is subject to a noncriminal citation .
Page No. 4 25.1054.02000